Hawaii statutes.
§302A-1145 Transfer to another school.
No school shall receive any child under eighteen years of age, who has attended
another school of the same class in the same complex area, unless the child
produces to the school in which to be enrolled, a certificate of release of the
school last attended by the child. If the child applies to enroll in a school
of higher grade, a certificate of proficiency shall be required or a lawful
excuse for its absence. The children from one complex area desiring to enter a
school in another complex area may be received or enrolled upon producing a
certificate of release from the school last attended in the other complex area.
[L 1996, c 89, pt of §2; am L 2014, c 16, §2 and c 232, §10]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next